Washington statutes.
RCW 9.01.110

Omission, when not punishable.

No person shall be punished for an omission to perform an act when such act has been performed by another acting in his or her behalf, and competent to perform it.

[ 2011 c 336 s 285; 1909 c 249 s 23; RRS s 2275.]